Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Chapter 56. Intercity Rail Passenger Service

§ 3001.
Repealed. 2003, No. 56, § 13, eff. June 4, 2003.

§ 3002.
Powers of Agency.

To carry out the purposes of

19 V.S.A. § 10e

, the Agency of Transportation may, subject to subsection (b) of this section:

Contract in the name of the State with federal agencies, the National Railroad Passenger Corporation (Amtrak), railroads, municipalities, adjacent states, or other responsible persons to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Receive, manage, use, or expend, for the purposes of this chapter, federal and State funds appropriated to the Agency for the promotion or development of intercity rail passenger service or for intercity rail passenger service facilities.

Operate, manage, use, exchange, lease, or otherwise deal with or dispose of, in whole or in part, land and rights in land acquired in the name of the State under authorization of this chapter, and to charge reasonable fees for such use or the use of land, buildings, and other facilities, or for services rendered. Monies received from the fees shall be credited to the Transportation Fund.

Acquire on behalf of the State, acting either alone or with municipalities or the federal government, land and rights in land needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

An acquisition or transfer under this section of property or rights in property with an appraised or other estimated value of $500,000.00 or above, or of an option to acquire property with an appraised or other estimated value of $500,000.00 or above, shall be made with the specific prior approval of the General Assembly of the acquisition or transfer and its terms or, if the General Assembly is not in session, with the specific prior approval of the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee. The requirement of this subsection shall not apply, however, if the General Assembly has approved a specific project described in the annual transportation program and the scope of the project includes the acquisition or transfer of property.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 6a, eff. May 22, 1996; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 14, eff. June 4, 2003;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 49.